South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3852.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1-7-920 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 1-7-920. The commission is composed of the following persons for terms as indicated: (1) the Chairmen of the Senate and House Judiciary Committees for the terms for which they are elected or their legislative designees; (2) the Attorney General for the term for which he is elected or his designee; (2)(3) the Chief of the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division for the term for which he is appointed; (3)(4) the Director of the Department of Public Safety shall serve during the term for which he is appointed; (4)(5) a director of a Judicial Circuit Pretrial Intervention Program appointed by the Governor for a term of two years; (5)(6) a Judicial Circuit Victim-Witness Assistance Advocate appointed by the Governor for a term of two years; (6)(7) five judicial circuit solicitors appointed by the Governor for a term of four years.  However, upon initial appointment, the Governor shall select one for a two-year term, two for a three-year term, and two for a four-year term.  If a solicitor appointed to the commission is not re-elected, a vacancy occurs and it must be filled pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-7-930. SECTION 2.  Section 24-3-550(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) To carry out an execution properly, the executioner and necessary staff must be present at the execution. In addition, the following persons may be present: (1) three representatives, approved by the director, of the family of a victim of the crime for which a death penalty was imposed, provided that, if there is more than one victim, the director may reduce the number of family representatives to one representative for each victim's family; provided further, that, if there are more than two victims, the director may restrict the total number of victims' representatives present in accordance with the space limitations of the Capital Punishment Facility; (2) the Attorney General or his designee; (2)(3) the solicitor, or an assistant solicitor or former solicitor designated by the solicitor, for the county where the offense occurred; (3)(4) a group of not more than three representatives of the South Carolina media, one of whom must represent the dominant wire service, one of whom must represent the print media, and one of whom must represent the electronic news media; (4)(5) the chief law enforcement officer, or an officer designated by the chief, from the law enforcement agency that had original jurisdiction in the case; and (5)(6) the counsel for the inmate and a religious leader. However, the inmate may substitute one person from his immediate family for either his counsel or a religious leader, or two persons from his immediate family for both his counsel and a religious leader. For purposes of this item, "immediate family" means those persons eighteen years of age or older who are related to the inmate by blood, adoption, or marriage within the second degree of consanguinity. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----